Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
806

CRIMINAL
PROCEDURE: CIRCUIT COURTS

Construction of Chapter

Section

806-1 Definitions

806-2 Inapplicable to district courts

Indictment and Information, Generally

806-6 Use of; furnishing of copy

806-7 Preparation of indictment, complaint, or
information;

true bill by grand jury

806-8 Prosecution where indictment not essential

806-9 Information, laws applicable

806-10 Form

806-11 Disposal of firearms

Venue

806-16 Venue; how stated

806-17 Circuits constitute district for criminal
trial by

jury

806-18 Change of venue

Joinder of Offenses and of Defendants

806-21 Joinder of defendants; accessories,
receivers

806-22 Joinder of charges against defendant

806-23 Misjoinder

Indictment and Information, Averments,
Defects

806-26 Meaning of words and phrases

806-27 Indictment; defects and omissions

806-28 Characterization of the act

806-29 Exceptions need not be negatived

806-30 Alternative allegations

806-31 Indirect allegations

806-32 Repugnancy

806-33 Surplusage

806-34 Sufficiency of averments as to offense and
transaction

806-35 Property owned by more than one

806-36 Property owned by corporation

806-37 Money, etc., how described

806-38 Instrument, how described

806-39 Same

806-40 Document of title

806-41 Ownership, not necessary to allege when

806-42 Second offense

Arraignment; Pleadings and Motions

806-46 Objections to indictment

806-47 Bill of particulars

806-48 Postponement

806-49 Arraignment; plea of not guilty

806-50 Standing mute

806-51 Plea of autrefois convict or acquit

Dismissal

806-56 Nolle prosequi

Trial; Evidence and Presumptions; Depositions

806-60 Jury of twelve required

806-61 Waiver of jury

806-62 Trial; order of proof and argument

806-63 Defense

806-64 Repealed

806-65 Depositions, right to inspect

806-66 Repealed

Sentence; Probation

806-71 Sentence

806-72 Probation officers

806-73 Duties and powers of probation officers;
adult

probation records

General Provisions

806-76 Court proceedings; reports to county clerk

Information Charging

806-81 Definitions

806-82 Prosecution of felonies by written
information

806-83 Felonies for which criminal charges may be
instituted

by written information

806-84 Exhibits

806-85 Probable cause

806-86 Procedure for motion to dismiss

806-87 Evidence at hearing on motion to dismiss

806-88 Ruling on motion to dismiss

Note

As to procedural statutes superseded by the rules of court,
see note preceding Title 32.

Case Notes

As the plain language of §806-2 limits the application of the
criminal procedure provisions of this chapter to the circuit courts, the
appellate court erred by extending the application of §806-28 to the district
courts. 127 H. 48, 276 P.3d 617 (2012).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next